Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-480
Disorders and prejudice of good order and discipline.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the armed forces, all conduct of a nature to bring discredit upon the armed forces and crimes and offenses not capital, of which persons subject to this code may be guilty, shall be taken cognizance of by a court-martial, according to the nature and degree of the offense, and shall be punished at the discretion of that court.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 80, p. 1580.